Maryland, session 2025, SB0482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–306.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO PUBLIC MIDDLE AND HIGH SCHOOLS IN
THE STATE.
(B) IN RESPONSE TO BEHAVIOR BY A STUDENT THAT DOES NOT CONFORM
TO THE BEHAVIORAL GUIDELINES ADOPTED BY THE COUNTY BOARD IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–306(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE, A TEACHER MAY REMOVE A
STUDENT FROM THE CLASSROOM IF:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0482*

SENATE BILL 482
(1) (I) THE STUDENT HAS REPEATEDLY INTERFERED WITH THE
TEACHER’S ABILITY TO COMMUNICATE WITH OTHER STUDENTS IN THE CLASSROOM
OR WITH OTHER STUDENTS’ ABILITY TO LEARN EFFECTIVELY; AND
(II) THE STUDENT’S CONDUCT HAS BEEN PREVIOUSLY
DOCUMENTED BY THE TEACHER; OR
(2) (I) THE STUDENT EXHIBITS BEHAVIOR THAT IS UNRULY,
DISRUPTIVE, OR ABUSIVE; AND
(II) THE BEHAVIOR SIGNIFICANTLY INTERFERES WITH THE
TEACHER’S ABILITY TO COMMUNICATE WITH OTHER STUDENTS IN THE CLASSROOM
OR WITH OTHER STUDENTS’ ABILITY TO LEARN EFFECTIVELY.
(C) IF A TEACHER REMOVES A STUDENT FROM THE CLASSROOM UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE TEACHER SHALL:
(1) DOCUMENT THE STUDENT’S BEHAVIOR;
(2) SUBMIT THE DOCUMENTATION OF THE BEHAVIOR TO THE
PRINCIPAL; AND
(3) SEND THE STUDENT TO THE SCHOOL PRINCIPAL OR GUIDANCE
COUNSELOR.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF
A STUDENT IS SENT TO THE PRINCIPAL UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
THE PRINCIPAL MAY:
(I) RETURN THE STUDENT TO THE CLASSROOM;
(II) PLACE THE STUDENT IN ANOTHER CLASSROOM;
(III) PLACE THE STUDENT IN IN–SCHOOL SUSPENSION;
(IV) PLACE THE STUDENT IN AN ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–304 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(V) LIMIT OR PROHIBIT THE STUDENT’S ATTENDANCE OR
PARTICIPATION IN SCHOOL–SPONSORED OR SCHOOL–RELATED ACTIVITIES.
(2) A PRINCIPAL MAY NOT RETURN A STUDENT TO A TEACHER’S
CLASSROOM WITHOUT THE TEACHER’S CONSENT, UNLESS THE PRINCIPAL,

SENATE BILL 482 3
GUIDANCE COUNSELOR, AND TEACHER DETERMINE THAT THE PLACEMENT IS THE
BEST OR ONLY OPTION AVAILABLE.
(E) IF A STUDENT IS SENT TO THE GUIDANCE COUNSELOR UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE GUIDANCE COUNSELOR SHALL DISCIPLINE
THE STUDENT USING RESTORATIVE APPROACHES IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–306 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) A COUNTY BOARD MAY NOT TAKE DISCIPLINARY ACTION AGAINST A
TEACHER WHO REMOVES A STUDENT FROM A CLASSROOM IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) A STUDENT WHO IS REMOVED FROM A CLASSROOM IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED REMOVED FROM THE CLASSROOM
FOR PURPOSES OF A REPORTING REQUIREMENT UNDER § 7–306 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.